Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1003
Assistance to the aged; additional qualifications required.

In order to qualify for assistance to the aged, an individual must, in addition to the requirements set forth in section 68-1002, have attained the age of sixty-five years.

Laws 1965, c. 395, § 3, p. 1265.